Florida, session 2026, SB1694.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âPresent paragraphs (e) through (h) of subsection 12 (3) of section 1007.25, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 13 paragraphs (f) through (i), respectively, and a new paragraph 14 (e) is added to that subsection, to read: 15 1007.25âGeneral education courses; common prerequisites; 16 other degree requirements.â 17 (3)âThe chair of the State Board of Education and the chair 18 of the Board of Governors, or their designees, shall jointly 19 appoint faculty committees to review and recommend to the 20 Articulation Coordinating Committee for approval by the State 21 Board of Education and the Board of Governors statewide general 22 education core course options for inclusion in the statewide 23 course numbering system established under s. 1007.24. Faculty 24 committees shall, by July 1, 2024, and by July 1 every 4 years 25 thereafter, review and submit recommendations to the 26 Articulation Coordinating Committee and the commissioner for the 27 removal, alignment, realignment, or addition of general 28 education core courses that satisfy the requirements of this 29 subsection. 30 (e)âGeneral education core courses that integrate the use 31 of technology must provide students with opportunities to 32 improve digital literacy and competency, instruction on the 33 application of artificial intelligence tools to the course, and 34 related instruction on software engineering, computer networks, 35 database systems, and cybersecurity, as applicable to the 36 course. 37 Section 2.âSubsection (6) of section 1007.2616, Florida 38 Statutes, is amended to read: 39 1007.2616âComputer science and technology instruction.â 40 (6)âHigh school students must be provided opportunities to 41 take computer science courses and earn technology-related 42 industry certifications to satisfy high school graduation 43 requirements as provided in s. 1003.4282(3). Computer science 44 courses and technology-related industry certifications that are 45 identified as eligible for meeting mathematics or science 46 requirements for high school graduation must be included in the 47 Course Code Directory. Computer science courses that include 48 instruction in artificial intelligence should provide students 49 with a foundational understanding of artificial intelligence to 50 critically evaluate how artificial intelligence systems use data 51 to present information; recognize the benefits, limitations, and 52 potential risks of artificial intelligence; and apply ethical 53 reasoning to the responsible use of artificial intelligence in 54 academic and personal contexts. 55 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.